Mississippi, session 2026, HB1162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Legislature finds and declares that certain toxic air pollutants and contaminants may pose risks that cause infants and children to be especially susceptible to illness, and that certain actions are necessary to ensure their safety from toxic air pollutants and contaminants. (2)  The Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality (MDEQ) shall establish a list of up to five (5) toxic air pollutants and contaminants that may cause the public, especially infants and children, to be susceptible to illness.  In developing the list, the department shall take into account public exposures to toxic air pollutants and contaminants, whether by themselves or by interacting with other toxic air pollutants and contaminants. (3)  Within two (2) years of the establishment of the list required under subsection (2) of this act, the department shall review and, as appropriate, revise any control measures adopted for the toxic air pollutants and contaminants identified on the list, to reduce exposure to those toxic air pollutants and contaminants, to protect public health, particularly the health of infants and children. (4)  Within three (3) years of the establishment of the list required under subsection (2) of this act, for up to five (5) of those toxic air pollutants and contaminants for which no control measures have been previously adopted, the department shall prepare a report on the need for rules or regulations.  The department shall adopt within that same three-year timeframe, as appropriate, any new control measures to reduce exposure to those toxic air pollutants and contaminants to protect public health, particularly the health of infants and children. (5)  The department shall annually evaluate at least fifteen (15) toxic air pollutants and contaminants identified or designated by the department, and provide threshold exposure levels and nonthreshold health values, as appropriate, for those toxic air pollutants and contaminants.  The activities required under this subsection (5) shall continue until all toxic air pollutants and contaminants are evaluated.  Based on this evaluation, the department shall update the list established under subsection (2) of this act, by July 1, 2027, and each year thereafter. Within three (3) years of the initial or subsequent listing update, for up to five (5) of the toxic air pollutants and contaminants contained on that list for which no control measures have been previously adopted, or for at least five (5) of the toxic air contaminants if more than five (5) toxic air contaminants have been identified, the department shall prepare a report on the need for rules or regulations.  The department shall adopt within that three-year timeframe, as appropriate, new control measures to reduce exposure to those toxic air pollutants and contaminants to protect public health, and particularly the health of infants and children. (6)  Toxic air pollutants and contaminants evaluated and listed under this section shall not include substances in those uses that are not subject to regulation by the department. (7)  The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to reduce emissions and airborne levels of such toxic air pollutants and contaminants evaluated and listed under this section to comply with standards as provided in Section 49-17-19. SECTION 2. (1)  Following the department's determinations and findings under Section 1 of this act, the executive officer of the department shall, with the participation of, and in consultation with, affected sources, the interested public, and a diverse group of experts, as determined by the department, prepare a report on the need and appropriate degree of regulation for each substance which the department has determined to be a toxic air pollutant or contaminant. (2)  The report shall address all of the following issues, to the extent data can reasonably be made available: (a)  The rate and extent of present and anticipated future emissions, the estimated levels of human exposure, and the risks associated with those levels; (b)  Potential ways to increase communication and transparency that alerts the public about violations and potential negative health threats; (c)  The stability, persistence, transformation products, dispersion potential, and other physical and chemical characteristics of the substance when present in the ambient air; (d)  The categories, numbers, and relative contribution of present or anticipated sources of the substance, including mobile, industrial, agricultural, and natural sources; (e)  An evaluation of the adequacy of current air quality monitoring systems, and the availability and technological feasibility of airborne toxic control measures to reduce or eliminate emissions, the anticipated effect of airborne toxic control measures on levels of exposure, and the degree to which proposed airborne toxic control measures are compatible with, or applicable to, recent technological improvements or other actions which emitting sources have implemented or taken in the recent past to reduce emissions; (f)  The approximate cost of each airborne toxic control measure, the magnitude of risks posed by the substances as reflected by the amount of emissions from the source or category of sources, and the reduction in risk which can be attributed to each airborne toxic control measure; (g)  The availability, suitability, and relative efficacy of substitute compounds of a less hazardous nature; and (h)  The potential adverse health, safety, or environmental impacts that may occur as a result of implementation of an airborne toxic control measure. (2)  The report, and relevant comments received during consultation with affected sources and the public, shall be made available for public review and comment at least forty five (45) days prior to a public hearing as provided in Section 49-17-25. SECTION 3.  (a) For purposes of this act, the term "covered facility" means a stationary source of air pollution that meets specific criteria established by the United States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA).  A facility's coverage under the EPA's Toxics Release Inventory Program is determined by its 6-digit North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) code. (b)  Covered facilities shall conduct real-time fence line monitoring of covered air toxics and report the results of such monitoring to the public.  A covered facility's outreach to communities near the such facility shall be conducted in the two (2) most prevalent languages spoken in the communities. (c)  The Mississippi Air Quality Control Commission shall consider adding new types of covered facilities and covered air toxics at least every five (5) years. SECTION 4.  Section 49-2-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-2-31.  (1)  Before July 1, 1995, the Department of Environmental Quality shall complete a comparative risk assessment that will include consideration of environmental risks to the health and welfare of the citizens of Mississippi and to the environment.  The assessment also shall include an examination of environmental factors, public health factors and socioeconomic factors.  The department shall provide for public participation in the assessment process. (2)  The requirements of this section shall be contingent upon the receipt of federal funds. SECTION 5.  Section 49-17-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-19.  In order to carry out the purposes of Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43, the commission may set ambient standards of air and water quality for the state or portions thereof. Such ambient standards of quality shall be such as to protect the public health and welfare and the present and prospective future use of such air and of such waters for public water supplies, propagation of fish and aquatic life and wildlife, recreational purposes, and agricultural, industrial and other legitimate uses. Such ambient standards may be amended from time to time as determined to be necessary by the commission.  In order to carry out the purposes of Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43, the commission may also set emission standards for the purpose of controlling air contamination, air pollution and the sources thereof.  In establishing ambient air quality standards for odor, the commission shall adopt recognized objective standards if they exist.  In the absence of a recognized objective ambient air quality standard for odor, the commission may adopt such subjective standards as may be appropriate. In establishing such standards relating to pesticides and commercial fertilizers for underground water, the commission shall adopt federal standards if they exist.  If no federal standard exists, the commission shall petition the United States Environmental Protection Agency to establish a federal standard for the substance of interest.  If the commission determines that a federal standard cannot be obtained within thirty (30) days, it shall consult with the United States Environmental Protection Agency's Office of Drinking Water and Office of Pesticide Programs regarding the agency's conclusion relative to available toxicological information on the substance of interest and on the methodology used for establishing a federal standard.  The commission shall utilize this information and methodology to establish a standard.  The commission may also consult with and request similar information from other sources. SECTION 6.  Section 49-17-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-21.  (a)  The commission or its duly authorized representative shall have the power to enter at reasonable times upon any private or public property, and the owner, managing agent or occupant of any such property shall permit such entry for the purpose of inspecting and investigating conditions relating to pollution or the possible pollution of any air or waters of the state and to have access to such records as the commission may require under subsection (b) of this section. (b)  The commission may require the maintenance of records relating to the operation of air contamination sources or water disposal systems, and any authorized representative of the commission may examine and copy any such records or memoranda pertaining to the operation of such air contamination source or water disposal system.  The records shall contain such information as the commission may require. Copies of such records shall be submitted to the commission upon request. (c)  The commission may conduct, authorize or require tests and take samples of air contaminants or waste waters, fuel, process material or other material which affects or may affect (1) emission of air contaminants from any source, or (2) waste water disposal systems.  Upon request of the commission, the person responsible for the source to be tested shall provide necessary sampling ports in stacks or ducts and such other safe and proper sampling and testing facilities as may be necessary for proper determination of the emission of air contaminants.  If an authorized employee of the commission during the course of any inspection obtains a sample of air contaminant, fuel, process material or other material, he shall give the owner or operator of the equipment or fuel facility a receipt for the sample obtained. (d)  The commission may require the installation, maintenance and use of such monitoring equipment and methods at such locations and intervals as the commission deems necessary. SECTION 7.  Section 49-17-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-25.  (1)  Prior to the adoption, amendment or repeal of rules and regulations necessary to implement this chapter, Sections 17-17-1 through 17-17-47, Sections 21-27-201 through 21-27-221, Sections 37-138-1 through 37-138-31, and all other laws administered by the department, the commission shall conduct a public hearing or hearings thereon after public notice.  Such notice shall be given by publication once a week for three (3) successive weeks in a newspaper having a general circulation throughout the state.  The notice shall contain a description of the proposed regulation and the time, date and place of the hearing. (2)  Additionally, the adoption, amendment or repeal of any rule or regulation under this chapter, Sections 17-17-1 through 17-17-47, Sections 21-27-201 through 21-27-221, Sections 37-138-1 through 37-138-31 and all other laws administered by the department shall be governed by the "Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law."  Any rule or regulation heretofore or hereafter adopted, amended or repealed in substantial compliance with the procedural requirements under Section 25-43-7 shall be valid.  A proceeding to contest any rule or regulation on the ground of noncompliance with the procedural requirements of this section must be commenced within one (1) year from the effective date of the rule or regulation. (3)  Notice of rules and regulations adopted by the commission shall be published once in a newspaper having general circulation throughout the state. SECTION 8.  Section 49-17-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-27.  In the event an emergency is found to exist by the commission, it may issue an emergency order as circumstances may require.  Said emergency order shall become operative at the time and date designated therein and shall remain in force until modified or cancelled by the commission or superseded by a regular order of the commission or for a period of forty-five (45) days from its effective date, whichever shall occur first, and may be enforced by an injunction if necessary. The chancery court shall always be deemed open for hearing requests for injunctions to enforce such emergency orders and the same shall have precedence over other matters. When, in the opinion of the commission or its executive director, an emergency situation exists which creates an imminent and substantial endangerment threatening the public health and safety or the lives and property of the people of this state, notice shall be given immediately to local governing authorities, both county and municipal, the state emergency management organization, and the Governor for appropriate action in accordance with applicable laws for protections against disaster situations. SECTION 9.  Section 49-17-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-29.  (1)  (a)  Except as in compliance with paragraph (b) of this subsection, it is unlawful for any person to cause pollution of the air in the state or to place or cause to be placed any wastes or other products or substances in a location where they are likely to cause pollution of the air.  It is also unlawful to discharge any wastes, products or substances into the air of the state which exceed standards of performance, hazardous air pollutant standards, other emission standards set by the commission, or which reduce the quality of the air below the air quality standards or increments established by the commission or prevent attainment or maintenance of those air quality standards. Any such action is hereby declared to be a public nuisance. (b)  It is unlawful for any person to build, erect, alter, replace, use or operate any equipment which will cause the issuance of air contaminants unless that person holds a permit from the Permit Board (except repairs or maintenance of equipment for which a permit has been previously issued), or unless that person is exempted from holding a permit by a regulation promulgated by the commission.  Concentrated animal feeding operations may be a source or a category of sources exempted under this paragraph.  However, no new or existing applications relating to swine concentrated animal feeding operations within a county shall be exempted from regulations and ordinances which have been duly passed by the county's board of supervisors and which are in force on June 1, 1998. (2)  (a)  Except as in compliance with paragraph (b) of this subsection, it is unlawful for any person to cause pollution of any waters of the state or to place or cause to be placed any wastes in a location where they are likely to cause pollution of any waters of the state.  It is also unlawful to discharge any wastes into any waters of the state which reduce the quality of those waters below the water quality standards established by the commission; or to violate any applicable pretreatment standards or limitations, technology-based effluent limitations, toxic standards or any other limitations established by the commission.  Any such action is declared to be a public nuisance. (b)  It is unlawful for any person to carry on any of the following activities, unless that person holds a current permit for that activity from the Permit Board as may be required for the disposal of all wastes which are or may be discharged into the waters of the state, or unless that person is exempted from holding a permit by a regulation promulgated by the commission: (i) the construction, installation, modification or operation of any disposal system or part thereof or any extension or addition thereto, including, but not limited to, systems serving agricultural operations; (ii) the increase in volume or strength of any wastes in excess of the permissive discharges specified under any existing permit; (iii) the construction, installation or operation of any industrial, commercial or other establishment, including irrigation projects or any extension or modification thereof or addition thereto, the operation of which would cause an increase in the discharge of wastes into the waters of the state or would otherwise alter the physical, chemical or biological properties of any waters of the state in any manner not already lawfully authorized; (iv) the construction or use of any new outlet for the discharge of any wastes into the waters of the state.  However, no new or existing applications relating to swine concentrated animal feeding operations within a county shall be exempted from regulations and ordinances which have been duly passed by the county's board of supervisors and which are in force on June 1, 1998. (3)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Permit Board created by Section 49-17-28 shall be the exclusive administrative body to make decisions on permit issuance, reissuance, denial, modification or revocation of air pollution control and water pollution control permits and permits required under the Solid Wastes Disposal Law of 1974 (Title 17, Chapter 17), and all other permits within the jurisdiction of the Permit Board.  After consideration of alternative waste treatment technologies available to control air and water pollution and odor, including appropriate siting criteria, the commission may promulgate regulations establishing conditions, limitations and exemptions under which the Permit Board shall make these decisions.  Regulations promulgated by the commission which establish exemptions as authorized under this section shall apply to any applicable facility in operation on the effective date of that regulation and to any applicable facility constructed or operated after the effective date of that regulation.  The Permit Board may issue multiple permits for the same facility or operation simultaneously or in the sequence that it deems appropriate consistent with the commission's regulations.  Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the Permit Board, under any conditions that the board may prescribe, may authorize the Executive Director of the Department of Environmental Quality to make decisions on permit issuance, reissuance, denial, modification or revocation.  The executive director shall not be authorized to make decisions on permit issuance, reissuance, denial, modification or revocation for a commercial hazardous waste management facility or a solid waste management permit for a municipal solid waste landfill or incinerator.  A decision by the executive director shall be a decision of the Permit Board and shall be subject to formal hearing and appeal as provided in this section.  The executive director shall report all permit decisions to the Permit Board at its next regularly scheduled meeting and those decisions shall be recorded in the minutes of the Permit Board.  The decisions of the Permit Board shall be recorded in minutes of the Permit Board and shall be kept separate and apart from the minutes of the commission.  The decision of the Permit Board or the executive director to issue, reissue, deny, modify or revoke permits shall not be construed to be an order or other action of the commission. (b)  The Executive Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall also be the Executive Director of the Permit Board and shall have available to him, as Executive Director of the Permit Board, all resources and personnel otherwise available to him as executive director of the department. (c)  All persons required to obtain an air pollution control or water pollution control permit, a permit under the Solid Wastes Disposal Law of 1974 (Title 17, Chapter 17) or any other permit within the jurisdiction of the Permit Board shall make application for that permit with the Permit Board.  The Permit Board, under any regulations as the commission may prescribe, may require the submission of those plans, specifications and other information as it deems necessary to carry out Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43 and Title 17, Chapter 17, or to carry out the commission's regulations adopted under those sections.  The Permit Board, based upon any information as it deems relevant, shall issue, reissue, deny, modify or revoke air pollution control or water pollution control permit or permits required under the Solid Wastes Disposal Law of 1974 (Title 17, Chapter 17) or any other permit within the jurisdiction of the Permit Board under any conditions as it deems necessary that are consistent with the commission's regulations.  The Permit Board's action of issuance, reissuance, denial, modification or revocation of a permit as recorded in its minutes shall constitute a complete decision of the board.  All permits issued by the Permit Board shall remain in full force and effect until the board makes a final determination regarding any reissuance, modification, or revocation thereof.  The Permit Board shall take action upon an application within one hundred eighty (180) days following its receipt in the board's principal office.  No action which affects revocation of an existing permit shall take effect until the thirty (30) days mentioned in paragraph (4)(b) of this section has expired or until a formal hearing as prescribed in that paragraph is held, whichever is later. (d)  The Permit Board may adopt rules of practice and procedure governing its proceedings that are consistent with the commission's regulations.  All hearings in connection with permits  issued, reissued, denied, modified or revoked and all appeals from decisions of the Permit Board shall be as provided in this section. (e)  Upon any conditions that are consistent with the commission's regulations and subject to those procedures for public notice and hearings as provided by law, not inconsistent with federal law and regulations, the Permit Board may issue general permits and, where appropriate, may consolidate multiple permits for the same facility or operation into a single permit. (f)  The Permit Board shall not issue any permit for a new swine concentrated animal feeding operation or the expansion of an existing swine concentrated animal feeding operation before January 1, 2000, unless the department received the application for that operation's new or modified permit before February 28, 1998, or except as provided in this paragraph (f).  In issuing or modifying any permit for which the department received an application before February 28, 1998, the Permit Board shall apply those siting criteria adopted or used by the commission before February 28, 1998, unless federal law or regulations require more stringent criteria.  The moratorium established in this paragraph shall not apply to the issuance of any permit for a new swine concentrated animal feeding operation or the expansion of an existing swine concentrated animal feeding operation that uses an animal waste management system which the applicant demonstrates to the Permit Board is innovative in significantly reducing the effects of the operation on the public health, welfare or the environment and which is approved by the Permit Board.  The Permit Board shall not issue or modify more than five (5) permits under this innovative animal waste management system technology exemption to the moratorium. (g)  Each applicant for a permit for a new outlet for the discharge of wastes into the waters of the state who is required to obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the Public Service Commission for such wastewater system shall submit financial and managerial information as required by the Public Utilities Staff.  Following review of that information, the Executive Director of the Public Utilities Staff shall certify in writing to the executive director of the department, the financial and managerial viability of the system if the Executive Director of the Public Utilities Staff determines the system is viable.  The Permit Board shall not issue the permit until the certification is received. (4)  (a)  Except as required by this section, before the issuance, reissuance, denial, modification or revocation of any air pollution control or water pollution control permit, permit required under the Solid Wastes Disposal Law of 1974 (Title 17, Chapter 17) or any other permit within its jurisdiction, the Permit Board, in its discretion, may hold a public hearing or meeting to obtain comments from the public on its proposed action. Before the issuance, reissuance, denial, modification pertaining to the expansion of a facility, transfer or revocation of a permit for a commercial hazardous waste management facility or a solid waste management permit for a commercial municipal solid waste landfill or incinerator, the Permit Board shall conduct a public hearing or meeting to obtain comments from the public on the proposed action.  That hearing or meeting shall be informal in nature and conducted under those procedures as the Permit Board may deem appropriate consistent with the commission's regulations. (b)  Within thirty (30) days after the date the Permit Board takes action upon permit issuance, reissuance, denial, modification or revocation, as recorded in the minutes of the Permit Board, any interested party aggrieved by that action may file a written request for a formal hearing before the Permit Board.  An interested party is any person claiming an interest relating to the property or project which is the subject of the permit action, and who is so situated that the person may be affected by the disposition of that action. The Permit Board shall fix the time and place of the formal hearing and shall notify the permittee of that time and place. In conducting the formal hearing, the Permit Board shall have the same full powers as to subpoenaing witnesses, administering oaths, examining witnesses under oath and conducting the hearing, as is now vested by law in the Mississippi Public Service Commission, as to the hearings before it, with the additional power that the Executive Director of the Permit Board may issue all subpoenas at the instance of the Permit Board or at the instance of any interested party.  Any subpoenas shall be served by any lawful officer in any county to whom the subpoena is directed and return made thereon as provided by law, with the cost of service being paid by the party on whose behalf the subpoena was issued.  Witnesses summoned to appear at the hearing shall be entitled to the same per diem and mileage as witnesses attending the circuit court and shall be paid by the person on whose behalf the witness was called.  Sufficient sureties for the cost of service of the subpoena and witness fees shall be filed with the Executive Director of the Permit Board at the time that issuance of the subpoena is requested.  At a hearing, any interested party may present witnesses and submit evidence and cross-examine witnesses. The Permit Board may designate a hearing officer to conduct the formal hearing on all or any part of the issues on behalf of the Permit Board.  The hearing officer shall prepare the record of the formal hearing conducted by that officer for the Permit Board and shall submit the record to the Permit Board. Upon conclusion of the formal hearing, the Permit Board shall enter in its minutes the board's decision affirming, modifying or reversing its prior decision to issue, reissue, deny, modify or revoke a permit.  The Permit Board shall prepare and record in its minutes findings of fact and conclusions of law supporting its decision.  That decision, as recorded in its minutes with its findings of fact and conclusions of law, shall be final unless an appeal, as provided in this section, is taken to chancery court within twenty (20) days following the date the decision is entered in the board's minutes. (c)  Within twenty (20) days after the date the Permit Board takes action upon permit issuance, reissuance, denial, modification or revocation after a formal hearing under this subsection as recorded in the minutes of the Permit Board, any person aggrieved of that action may appeal the action as provided in subsection (5) of this section. (5)  (a)  Appeals from any decision or action of the Permit Board shall be only to chancery court as provided in this subsection. (b)  Any person who is aggrieved by any decision of the Permit Board issuing, reissuing, denying, revoking or modifying a permit after a formal hearing may appeal that decision within the period specified in subsection (4)(c) of this section to the chancery court of the county of the situs in whole or in part of the subject matter.  The appellant shall give a cost bond with sufficient sureties, payable to the state in the sum of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), to be fixed by the Permit Board and to be filed with and approved by the Executive Director of the Permit Board, who shall forthwith certify the filing of the bond together with a certified copy of the record of the Permit Board in the matter to the chancery court to which the appeal is taken, which shall thereupon become the record of the cause.  An appeal to the chancery court as provided in this section shall not stay the decision of the Permit Board.  The aggrieved party may, within twenty (20) days following the date the board's decision after a formal hearing is entered on the board's minutes, petition the chancery court for an appeal with supersedeas and the chancellor shall grant a hearing on that petition.  Upon good cause shown, the chancellor may grant that appeal with supersedeas.  If granted, the appellant shall be required to post a bond with sufficient sureties according to law in an amount to be determined by the chancellor.  Appeals shall be considered only upon the record as made before the Permit Board.  The chancery court shall always be deemed open for hearing of an appeal and the chancellor may hear the same in termtime or in vacation at any place in the chancellor's district, and the appeal shall have precedence over all civil cases, except election contests.  The chancery court shall review all questions of law and of fact.  If no prejudicial error is found, the matter shall be affirmed.  If prejudicial error is found the decision of the board shall be reversed and the chancery court shall remand the matter to the Permit Board for appropriate action as may be indicated or necessary under the circumstances.  Appeals may be taken from the chancery court to the Supreme Court in the manner as now required by law, except that if a supersedeas is desired by the party appealing to the chancery court, that party may apply for a supersedeas to the chancellor of that court, who shall award a writ of supersedeas, without additional bond, if in the chancellor's judgment material damage is not likely to result thereby; but otherwise, the chancellor shall require a supersedeas bond as the chancellor deems proper, which shall be liable to the state for any damage. SECTION 10.  Section 49-17-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-31.  (a)  Whenever the commission or an employee thereof has reason to believe that a violation of any provision of Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43 or Sections 17-17-1 through 17-17-47 or a regulation or of any order of the commission or of any limitation or condition of a valid permit has occurred, the commission may cause a written complaint to be served upon the alleged violator or violators.  The complaint shall specify the provisions of said sections or regulation or order or permit alleged to be violated and the facts alleged to constitute a violation thereof, and shall require that the alleged violator appear before the commission at a time and place specified in the notice and answer the charges complained of. Said time of appearance before the commission shall be not less than ten (10) days from the date of the service of the complaint. (b)  The commission shall afford an opportunity for a fair hearing to the alleged violator or violators at the time and place specified in the complaint.  On the basis of the evidence produced at the hearing, the commission shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law and enter such order as in its opinion will best further the purposes of Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43 and Sections 17-17-1 through 17-17-47, and shall give written notice of such order to the alleged violator and to such other persons as shall have appeared at the hearing or made written request for notice of the order, and the commission may assess such penalties as hereinafter provided. (c)  Except as otherwise expressly provided, any notice, or other instrument issued by or under authority of the commission may be served on any person affected thereby personally or by publication, and proof of such service may be made in like manner as in case of service of a summons in a civil action, such proof to be filed in the office of the commission; or such service may be made by mailing a copy of the notice, order, or other instrument by certified mail, directed to the person affected at his last known post office address as shown by the files or records of the commission, and proof thereof may be made by the affidavit of the person who did the mailing, filed in the office of the commission. SECTION 11.  Section 49-17-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-33.  The hearings herein provided may be conducted by the commission itself at a regular or special meeting of the commission, or the commission may designate a hearing officer, who may be the executive director, who shall have the power and authority to conduct such hearings in the name of the commission at any time and place as conditions and circumstances may warrant. The hearing officer shall have the record prepared of any hearing which he has conducted for the commission.  Such record shall be submitted to the commission along with that hearing officer's findings of fact and recommended decision.  Upon receipt and review of the record of the hearing and the hearing officer's findings of fact and recommended decision, the commission shall thereupon render its final decision in the matter.  Any person ordered to appear for an alleged violation shall have the right to request a hearing before a majority of the commission if he prefers and such a hearing may then be set for the next regular meeting of the full commission, or specially.  A verbatim record of the proceedings of such hearings shall be taken and filed with the commission, together with findings of fact and conclusions of law made by the commission.  Witnesses who are subpoenaed shall receive the same fees and mileage as in civil actions.  In case of contumacy or refusal to obey a notice of hearing or subpoena issued under this section, the circuit court shall have jurisdiction, upon application of the commission or its representative, to issue an order requiring such person to appear and testify or produce evidence as the case may require and any failure to obey such order of the court may be punished by such court as contempt thereof.  Failure to appear at any such hearing, without prior authorization to do so from the commission or its designee, may result in the commission finding the alleged violator guilty of the charges complained of by default, and at such time an order may be entered, including the assessment of a penalty, which, in the opinion of the commission, will best further the purposes of Section 17-17-1 et seq., and Section 49-17-1 et seq. SECTION 12.  Section 49-17-34, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-34.  (1)  Within fifteen (15) days after receipt by the Department of Environmental Quality an application for any initial or modified air or water permit required under the Mississippi Air and Water Pollution Control Law that is submitted after April 16, 1993, the Department of Environmental Quality shall acknowledge in writing receipt of such application.  Except for good cause shown, within forty-five (45) days after receipt of a permit application, the Department of Environmental Quality shall notify the applicant that the application is complete or of the major components required to complete the application. (2)  All rules, regulations and standards relating to air quality, water quality or air emissions or water discharge standards promulgated by the commission after April 16, 1993 shall be consistent with and shall not exceed the requirements of federal statutes and federal regulations, standards, criteria and guidance relating to air quality, water quality or air emission or water discharge standards that have been duly promulgated pursuant to the federal Administrative Procedures Act, including but not limited to the identity and scope of air pollutants included as air toxics or air quality or emission standards, the identity and scope of water pollutants included as water quality or discharge standards and the numerical and narrative limitations of such standards. (3)  If there are no federal statutes or federal regulations, standards, criteria or guidance that have been duly promulgated pursuant to the federal Administrative Procedures Act addressing matters relating to air quality or water quality, or air emission or water discharge standards, the commission may promulgate regulations to address these matters in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Act, when the commission determines that such regulations are necessary to protect human health, welfare or the environment. (4)  For any initial or modified air or water permit issued from and after January 1, 1994, except with the written consent of the permit applicant, no provision or condition imposing any duty, responsibility or liability on the permittee shall be included in such permit, the direct basis for which has not been first promulgated as a regulation by the commission in accordance with the requirements of the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Act. "Direct basis" shall mean that such permit provisions or conditions shall not exceed the scope, coverage and effect of the regulation upon which it is based including, but not limited to, frequency or time limit of action, technology, identity and scope of pollutants regulated, numerical or narrative standards or limitations. SECTION 13.  Section 49-17-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-35.  Any interested person shall have the right to request the commission to call a hearing for the purpose of taking action in respect to any matter within the jurisdiction of the commission by making a request therefor in writing.  Upon receipt of any such request, the commission shall conduct such investigations as it deems necessary and may call a special hearing or may schedule such matter for its next regular meeting or hearing day, and after such hearings and with all convenient speed and in any event within thirty (30) days after the conclusion of such hearing shall take such action on the subject matter thereof as it may deem appropriate. SECTION 14.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.